Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 2. Licenses

§ 1251.
License requirements.

A person, partnership, corporation, association, or other organization shall not open or maintain a funeral establishment unless the establishment is licensed by the Office to conduct the business and unless the owner, a co-owner, or manager is a licensed funeral director.

A person, partnership, corporation, association, or other organization shall not open or maintain a crematory establishment unless the establishment is licensed by the Office.

A person shall not hold himself or herself out as performing the duties of a funeral director unless licensed by the Office.

Except as otherwise permitted by law, a person employed by a funeral or crematory establishment shall not perform a removal unless registered with the Office.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 224

, § 4;

1969, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 11;

1973, No. 236

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2001, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 14, eff. June 27, 2002;

2005, No. 27

, § 40;

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 15.

§ 1252.
Application; qualifications.

Funeral director.

Any person holding a high school certificate or its equivalent shall be entitled to take an examination as a funeral director provided that he or she has:

graduated from a school of funeral service accredited or approved by the American Board of Funeral Service Education in a course of instruction of not less than two academic years, or graduated from a school of funeral service accredited or approved by the American Board of Funeral Service Education in a course of instruction of not less than one academic year or its equivalent as determined by the Director, with 30 additional credit hours in subjects approved by the Director and obtained in a college or university approved by the Director;

completed a traineeship of 12 months of full-time employment or its equivalent under the direct supervision of a person duly licensed for the practice of funeral service within a licensed funeral establishment not connected with a school. The duration of the traineeship and the work performed shall be verified by affidavit as required by the Director; and

submitted a written application and the required application fee.

The Director may waive the educational and traineeship requirements for examination as a funeral director, provided the applicant possesses a valid license from another state with licensure requirements substantially similar to those required by this chapter.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1)(A) of this subsection, the Director may by rule prescribe an alternative pathway to licensure for individuals who have not attended a school of funeral service but who have demonstrated through an approved program of apprenticeship and study the skills deemed necessary by the Director to ensure competence as a funeral director.

Embalmer.

Any person holding a high school certificate or its equivalent shall be entitled to take an examination in embalming provided that he or she has:

graduated from a school of funeral service accredited or approved by the American Board of Funeral Service Education in a course of instruction of not less than two academic years, or graduated from a school of funeral service accredited or approved by the American Board of Funeral Service Education in a course of instruction of not less than one academic year or its equivalent as determined by the Director, with 30 additional credit hours in subjects approved by the Director and obtained in a college or university approved by the Director;

served a traineeship of 12 months of full-time employment or its equivalent under the direct supervision of a person duly licensed for the practice of funeral service, within a licensed funeral establishment not connected with a school. The duration of the traineeship and the work performed shall be verified by affidavit as required by the Director; and

submitted a written application and the required application fee.

The Director may waive the educational and traineeship requirements for examination as an embalmer, provided the applicant possesses a valid license from another state with licensure requirements substantially similar to those required by this chapter.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1)(A) of this subsection, the Director may by rule prescribe an alternative pathway to licensure for individuals who have not attended a school of funeral service but who have demonstrated through an approved program of apprenticeship and study the skills deemed necessary by the Director to ensure competence as an embalmer.

Funeral establishment.

A person, partnership, association, or other organization desiring to operate a funeral establishment, shall apply, in writing, to the Director for a license. The applicant, if a corporation, partnership, association, or other organization, must have a manager or co-owner who is a licensed funeral director.

The application for a license shall be sworn to by the individual, a partner, or a duly authorized officer of a corporation, and shall be on the form prescribed and furnished by the Director, and the applicant shall furnish such information as required by the Director by rule. The application shall be accompanied by a licensing fee.

Crematory establishment.

A person, partnership, corporation, association, or other organization desiring to operate a crematory establishment shall apply, in writing, to the Director for a license. The applicant, if a partnership, corporation, association, or other organization, must have a designated manager or co-owner who is responsible for the operation of the establishment and who is registered with the Office under subsection (e) of this section.

The application for a license shall be sworn to by the individual, or a partner or a duly authorized officer of a corporation, shall be on the form prescribed and furnished by the Director, and the applicant shall furnish information, as required by rule. The application shall be accompanied by a licensing fee. However, the applicant shall not be required to pay the fee under this subsection if the applicant pays the fee under subsection (b) of this section.

Crematory personnel.

Any person who desires to engage in direct handling, processing, identification, or cremation of dead human remains within a licensed crematory establishment shall register with the Office and pay the fee established in subsection 1256(d) of this chapter. The applicant shall have attained the age of majority and be directly employed by a licensed crematory establishment.

The Director may prescribe, by rule, the forms for applicants, which may include proof of completion of up to three hours of education and training in programs approved by the Director.

Removal personnel.

Any person who desires to engage in removals shall register with the Office and pay the fee established in subsection 1256(d) of this chapter. The applicant shall have attained the age of majority and be directly employed by a licensed funeral or crematory establishment, or the University of Vermont for removals related to the University’s anatomical gift program.

The Director may prescribe, by rule, the forms for applicants, which may include proof of completion of up to three hours of education and training in infectious diseases in programs approved by the Director.

Registrants under this subsection are authorized to perform removals only, as defined by this chapter. Unregistered personnel may accompany registered personnel to assist in removals so long as they have been instructed in handling and precautionary procedures prior to the call.

Limited services establishment.

The Director may adopt rules for the issuance of limited service establishment licenses in accordance with this chapter. Limited service establishment licensees are authorized to perform only disposition services without arranging, directing, or performing embalming, public viewings, gatherings, memorials, funerals, or related ceremonies. Disposition services under this subsection include direct cremation, direct alkaline hydrolysis, immediate burial, or direct green burial.

Limited services shall be overseen by a funeral director licensed under this chapter who is employed by the limited service establishment.

Each limited service arrangement shall include a mandatory written disclosure providing notice to the purchaser that limited services do not include embalming, public viewings, gatherings, memorials, funerals, or related ceremonies.

A funeral director associated with a funeral establishment licensed under subsection (c) of this section may provide limited services so long as the mandatory disclosure described under subdivision (3) of this subsection is provided to the purchaser.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 224

, § 5;

1969, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 12;

1971, No. 184

(Adj. Sess.), § 18, eff. March 29, 1972;

1973, No. 236

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 35;

2001, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 15, eff. June 27, 2002;

2005, No. 27

, § 41;

2009, No. 35

, § 18;

2013, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2017, No. 48

, § 11;

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. Oct. 1, 2020.

§ 1253.
Examinations.

An applicant for a funeral director’s or embalmer’s license shall be examined as the Director may require by rule.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 224

, § 6;

1969, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 13;

2009, No. 35

, § 19;

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 15.

§ 1254.
Issuance or denial of license.

If, upon review, it is found that the applicant possesses sufficient skill and knowledge of the business and has met the application and qualification requirements set forth in this chapter, the Director shall issue to him or her a license to engage in the business of funeral director, embalmer, funeral establishment, crematory establishment, or removal personnel.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 224

, § 7;

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 36;

2001, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 16, eff. June 27, 2002;

2005, No. 27

, § 42;

2007, No. 76

, § 5;

2009, No. 35

, § 20;

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 15.

§ 1255.
Repealed. 2017, No. 144 (Adj. Sess.), § 15.

§ 1256.
Renewal of registration or license.

Biennially, every licensee shall renew his or her or its registration or license by paying the required fee.

Upon request of the Board of Health or a person authorized to issue burial or removal permits, a licensee shall show proof of current licensure.

[Repealed.]

Subsection (d) repealed effective June 1, 2023.Applicants and persons regulated under this chapter shall pay the following fees: =forms

Application for license $ 70.00

Biennial renewal of license

Funeral director $ 350.00

Embalmer $ 350.00

Funeral establishment $ 800.00

Crematory establishment $ 800.00

Crematory personnel $ 125.00

Removal personnel $ 125.00

Limited services establishment license $ 800.00

In addition to the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, an applicant for renewal as a funeral director or embalmer shall have satisfactorily completed continuing education as required by the Director.
(e) (1) In addition to the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, an applicant for renewal as a funeral director or embalmer shall have satisfactorily completed continuing education as required by the Director.

For purposes of this subsection, the Director shall require, by rule, not less than six nor more than ten hours of approved continuing education as a condition of renewal and may require up to three hours of continuing education for removal personnel in the subject area of universal precautions and infectious diseases.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 224

, §§ 8, 9;

1969, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 14;

1973, No. 236

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.) § 37;

1991, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 29;

1991, No. 219

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. May 28, 1992;

1995, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 10;

1999, No. 49

, § 176;

2001, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 24, eff. June 21, 2002;

2001, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. June 27, 2002;

2005, No. 27

, § 43;

2005, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 12;

2007, No. 76

, § 4;

2009, No. 35

, § 21;

2011, No. 33

, § 3;

2013, No. 191

(Adj. Sess.), § 14;

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 16, eff. June 1, 2023.

§ 1257.
Unprofessional conduct.

A licensee shall not engage in unprofessional conduct.

Unprofessional conduct means the following conduct and conduct set forth in

3 V.S.A. § 129a

:

Using dishonest or misleading advertising.

Failure to make available, upon request of a person who had received services, copies of documents in the possession or under the control of the practitioner.

Failure to comply with rules adopted by the Director, the Office, or by the Federal Trade Commission relating to funeral goods and services.

For funeral directors, failure to make available at the licensee’s place of business, by color picture or display, the three least expensive caskets, as available. For the purposes of this section and related administrative rules, the three least expensive caskets shall include one cloth, one metal, and one wood casket.

[Repealed.]

[Repealed.]

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Amended

1969, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

1973, No. 236

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1995, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1997, No. 40

, § 22c;

1997, No. 145

(Adj. Sess.), § 38;

1999, No. 133

(Adj. Sess.), § 14;

2001, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 18, eff. June 27, 2002;

2005, No. 27

, § 44;

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 15.

§ 1258.
Repealed.
1995, No. 138, § 11.